src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON A_/europäisch__adj
A_abenteuerlich__adj ;

LEXICON A_/alt__adj
!A_/oft__adj, A_/h/art__adj
+A+Pos: A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A:%^Umlaut  A_abenteuerlich__adj-comp ;
+A:%^Umlaut%>e  A_abenteuerlich__adj-sup ;

LEXICON A_/arg__adj
!kl/ug__adj, kr/ank__adj, l/ang__adj, sch/arf__adj, st/ark__adj, A_/arm__adj, A_/fr/omm__adj
! A_/j/ung__adj, A_/gr/ob__adj, schw/ach__adj
+A+Pos: A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A:%^Umlaut  A_abenteuerlich__adj-comp ;
+A:%^Umlaut A_abenteuerlich__adj-sup ;


LEXICON A_/viel__adj !!= * @CODE@ viel:
+A+Pos:viel A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Comp:mehrer A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Superl:meist A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Pos+Pred:viel # ;
+A+Comp+Pred:mehrer # ;
+A+Superl+Pred:meist # ;

LEXICON A_/gut__adj
+A+Pos:gut A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Comp:besser A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Superl:best A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Pos+Pred:gut # ;
+A+Comp+Pred:besser # ;
+A+Superl+Pred:best # ;

LEXICON A_allerbest__adj
+A:  A_abenteuerlich__adj-sup ;

LEXICON A_allerhand__adj
+A: #;

LEXICON A_bass__adj
+A: #;
LEXICON A_dröge__adj
+A: A_abenteuerlich__adj ;

LEXICON A_teu/er__adj
!A_/akzeptab/el__adj
+A+Pos: A_teu/er__adj-positive ;
+A+Comp:%^Pen%^RmVow%>er A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Superl:st A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;

LEXICON A_teu/er__adj-positive
+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%^Pen%^RmVow%>em # ;!st
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%^Pen%^RmVow%>er # ;!st
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!sw
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%^Pen%^RmVow%>er # ;!mix

+Pl+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!st
+Pl+Acc+Def:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Pl+Acc+Indef:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix
+Pl+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Pl+Dat+Def:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Pl+Dat+Indef:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Pl+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%^Pen%^RmVow%>er # ;!st
+Pl+Gen+Def:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Pl+Gen+Indef:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix
+Pl+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!st
+Pl+Nom+Def:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix

+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%^Pen%^RmVow%>es # ;!st
+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!sw
+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%^Pen%^RmVow%>es # ;!mix
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%^Pen%^RmVow%>em # ;!st
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix
+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%^Pen%^RmVow%>es # ;!st
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!sw
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%^Pen%^RmVow%>es # ;!mix

+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%^Pen%^RmVow%>er # ;!st
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%^Pen%^RmVow%>er # ;!st
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!

+Attr: # ;
+Pred: # ;



LEXICON A_gewiss__adj
+A+Pos: A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Comp:%>er A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Superl:%>st A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;

LEXICON A_gr/oß__adj
!k/urz__adj, schw/arz__adj
+A+Pos: A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Comp:%^Umlaut%>er A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Superl:%^Umlaut%>st A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;

LEXICON A_h/och__adj
+A+Pos+Pred:ch # ;
+A+Pos:h A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive  ;
+A+Comp:h%^Umlaut%>er A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Superl:ch%^Umlaut%>st A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
LEXICON A_minde/r__adj !!= * @CODE@ minder:minde
+A+Comp:%>r A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Superl:%>st A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;

LEXICON A_n/ah__adj !!= * @CODE@ nah:na
+A+Pos:h A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Comp:h%^Umlaut%>er A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Superl:ch%^Umlaut%>st A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;

LEXICON A_nämlich__adj
+A+Pos: A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;

LEXICON A_schm/al__adj
+A+Pos: A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Comp:%>er A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Comp:%^Umlaut%>er A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Superl:%>st A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Superl:%^Umlaut%>st A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;

LEXICON A_n/ass__adj
+A+Pos: A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Comp:%^Umlaut%>er A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Superl:%^Umlaut%>st A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;



LEXICON Comparisons
+A+pos:0        Cases   ;
+A+cmp:er       Cases   ;
+A+sup:est      Cases   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
