src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
akzeptabel:akzeptabel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
alkoholfrei:alkoholfrei A_allerhand__adj ;
allein:allein A_allerhand__adj ;
allerbest:allerbest A_allerbest__adj ;
allererst:allererst A_allerbest__adj ;
allergrößt:allergrößt A_allerbest__adj ;
allerhand:allerhand A_allerhand__adj ;
allerhöchst:allerhöchst A_allerbest__adj ;
allerlei:allerlei A_allerhand__adj ;
allerletzt:allerletzt A_allerbest__adj ;
allermeist:allermeist A_allerbest__adj ;
allerneueste:allerneueste A_dröge__adj ;
allerwenigst:allerwenigst A_allerbest__adj ;
alt:alt A_/alt__adj ;
angst:angst A_allerhand__adj ;
arg:arg A_/arg__adj ;
arm:arm A_/arg__adj ;!A_/arm__adj ;
äußere:äußere A_dröge__adj ;
außereuropäisch:außer#europäisch A_/europäisch__adj ;
bange:bange A_dröge__adj ;
barfuß:barfuß A_allerhand__adj ;
bass:bass A_bass__adj ;
beige:beige A_dröge__adj ;
besondere:besondere A_dröge__adj ;
binnen:binnen A_allerhand__adj ;
bitterböse:bitterböse A_dröge__adj ;
böse:böse A_dröge__adj ;
brach:brach A_allerhand__adj ;
brutto:brutto A_allerhand__adj ;
dingfest:dingfest A_allerhand__adj ;
dröge:dröge A_dröge__adj ;
dufte:dufte A_dröge__adj ;
dumm:dumm A_/arg__adj ;!A_d/umm__adj ;
dunkel:dunkel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
edel:edel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
eitel:eitel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
europäisch:europäisch A_/europäisch__adj ;
fidel:fidel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
flexibel:flexibel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
flügge:flügge A_dröge__adj ;
fromm:fromm A_/arg__adj ;!A_fr/omm__adj ;
frühere:frühere A_dröge__adj ;
gelinde:gelinde A_dröge__adj ;
gelinde:gelinde A_dröge__adj ;
gerade:gerade A_dröge__adj ;
gewiss:gewiss A_gewiss__adj ;
gewiß:gewiß A_gewiss__adj ;
glamourös:glamourös A_gewiss__adj ;
grob:grob A_/arg__adj ;!A_gr/ob__adj ;
groß:groß A_gr/oß__adj ;
gut: A_/gut__adj ;
hart:hart A_/arg__adj ;!A_h/art__adj ;
heikel:heikel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
heimwehkrank:heim#weh#krank A_/arg__adj ;!A_kr/ank__adj ;
hiesige:hiesige A_dröge__adj ;
hoch:ho A_h/och__adj ;
inakzeptabel:inakzeptabel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
inclusive:inclusive A_dröge__adj ;
indiskutabel:indiskutabel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
irreversibel:irreversibel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
jahrhundertealt:jahr#hunderte#alt A_/alt__adj ;
jung:jung A_/arg__adj ;!A_j/ung__adj ;
kalt:kalt A_/alt__adj ;
klug:klug A_/arg__adj ;!
komfortabel:komfortabel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
kompatibel:kompatibel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
krank:krank A_/arg__adj ;!A_/arg__adj ;!A_kr/ank__adj ;
krumm:krumm A_/arg__adj ;!A_d/umm__adj ;
kurz:kurz A_gr/oß__adj ;!A_k/urz__adj ;
lang:lang A_/arg__adj ;!A_l/ang__adj ;
leise:leise A_dröge__adj ;
leise:leise A_dröge__adj ;
leistungsstark:leistungs#stark A_/arg__adj ;!A_st/ark__adj ;
linke:linke A_dröge__adj ;
manche:manche A_dröge__adj ;
marode:marode A_dröge__adj ;
minder:minde A_minde/r__adj ; 
miserabel:miserabel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
mittel:mittel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
mittlere:mittlere A_dröge__adj ;
müde:müde A_dröge__adj ;
müde:müde A_dröge__adj ;
multipel:multipel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
muskulös:muskulös A_gewiss__adj ;
nah:na A_n/ah__adj ;
nämlich:nämlich A_nämlich__adj ;
nass:nass A_n/ass__adj ;
natur:natur A_allerhand__adj ;
nobel:nobel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
obere:obere A_dröge__adj ;
öde:öde A_dröge__adj ;
oft:oft A_/arg__adj ;!A_/oft__adj ;
orange:orange A_dröge__adj ;
passabel:passabel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
penibel:penibel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
plausibel:plausibel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
pleite:pleite A_allerhand__adj ;
praktikabel:praktikabel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
prätentiös:prätentiös A_gewiss__adj ;
prima:prima A_allerhand__adj ;
profitabel:profitabel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
rechtens:rechtens A_allerhand__adj ;
rechts:rechts A_allerhand__adj ;
rege:rege A_dröge__adj ;
religiöse:religiöse A_dröge__adj ;
rentabel:rentabel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
respektabel:respektabel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
schade:schade A_allerhand__adj ;
scharf:scharf A_/arg__adj ;!A_sch/arf__adj ;
schmal:schmal A_schm/al__adj ;
schnöde:schnöde A_dröge__adj ;
schuld:schuld A_allerhand__adj ;
schwach:schwach A_/arg__adj ;!A_schw/ach__adj ;
schwarz:schwarz A_gr/oß__adj ;!A_schw/arz__adj 
seekrank:see#krank A_/arg__adj ;!A_/arg__adj ;!A_kr/ank__adj ;
sensibel:sensibel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
simpel:simpel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
sportverrückt:sportverrückt A_allerhand__adj ;
stark:stark A_/arg__adj ;!A_st/ark__adj ;
tabu:tabu A_allerhand__adj ;
tausende:tausende A_allerhand__adj ;
teuer:teuer A_teu/er__adj ;
träge:träge A_dröge__adj ;
übel:übel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
übernächst:übernächst A_allerbest__adj ;
umfassend:umfassend A_allerhand__adj ;
variabel:variabel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
verbrieft:verbrieft A_allerhand__adj ;
veritabel:veritabel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
viel: A_/viel__adj ;
vonnöten:vonnöten A_allerhand__adj ;
vorletzte:vorletzte A_dröge__adj ;
warm:warm A_/arg__adj ;!A_/arm__adj ;
weise:weise A_dröge__adj ;
weitere:weitere A_dröge__adj ;
wurscht:wurscht A_allerhand__adj ;
zart:zart A_/arg__adj ;!A_h/art__adj ;
zwangsweise:zwangsweise A_dröge__adj ;
zwecklos:zwecklos A_gewiss__adj ;
in% Betrieb:in% Betrieb A_allerhand__adj ;
mit% Eselsohren:mit% Eselsohren A_allerhand__adj ;
